Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-853
Authority; public purpose; exemptions from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance
Authority Act shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the
state, for the increase of their commerce,
welfare, and prosperity, for the fostering, encouragement, protection, and improvement
of their health and living conditions, and for the development of their intellectual
and mental capacities and skills, and as the operation, maintenance, financing,
or refinancing of a project or program by the authority or its agent will
constitute the performance of essential governmental functions and serve a
public purpose, neither the authority nor its agent shall be required to pay
any taxes or assessments, upon or with respect to a project or any property
acquired or used by the authority or its agent under the act, upon the income
therefrom, or upon any other amounts received by the authority in respect
thereof, including payments of principal of or premium or interest on or in
respect of any securities purchased pursuant to section 58-844 or
any government securities involved in a plan of financing pursuant to section 58-845. The bonds issued under the act, the
interest thereon, the proceeds received by a holder from the sale of such
bonds to the extent of the holder's cost of acquisition, or proceeds received
upon redemption prior to maturity, proceeds received at maturity, and the
receipt of such interest and proceeds shall be exempt from taxation in the
State of Nebraska for all purposes except the state inheritance tax.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 50;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2950;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 50;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1750;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 53.